Washington statutes.
RCW 16.38.040

Agreements and/or contracts with other entities.

In carrying out such diagnostic service program the director of agriculture may enter into agreements and/or contracts with any other governmental agencies whether state or federal or public institution such as Washington State University or private institutions and/or research organizations.

[ 1969 c 100 s 4.]